Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202688-551
Fees; where credited.

Except as provided in sections 88-527, 88-529, 88-545.01, and 88-552, all fees collected pursuant to the Grain Warehouse Act shall be paid to the State Treasurer and credited to the Grain Dealer and Grain Warehouse Cash Fund.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1123, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB894, § 9.
July 18, 2026